Maryland, session 2025, SB0174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
SUBTITLE 3A. INTERSTATE SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE COMPACT.
19–3A–01.
THE SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE COMPACT IS ENACTED INTO LAW AND
ENTERED INTO WITH ALL OTHER STATES LEGALLY JOINING IN IT IN THE FORM
SUBSTANTIALLY AS IT APPEARS IN THIS SECTION AS FOLLOWS:
SECTION 1. PURPOSE.
THE PURPOSE OF THIS COMPACT IS TO FACILITATE INTERSTATE PRACTICE
OF REGULATED SOCIAL WORKERS BY IMPROVING PUBLIC ACCESS TO COMPETENT
SOCIAL WORK SERVICES. THE COMPACT PRESERVES THE REGULATORY AUTHORITY
OF STATES TO PROTECT PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY THROUGH THE CURRENT
SYSTEM OF STATE LICENSURE. THIS COMPACT IS DESIGNED TO ACHIEVE THE
FOLLOWING OBJECTIVES:
(1) INCREASE PUBLIC ACCESS TO SOCIAL WORKERS;
– 1 –

Ch. 10 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) REDUCE OVERLY BURDENSOME AND DUPLICATIVE
REQUIREMENTS ASSOCIATED WITH HOLDING MULTIPLE LICENSES;
(3) ENHANCE THE MEMBER STATES’ ABILITY TO PROTECT THE
PUBLIC’S HEALTH AND SAFETY;
(4) ENCOURAGE THE COOPERATION OF MEMBER STATES IN
REGULATING MULTISTATE PRACTICE;
(5) PROMOTE MOBILITY AND ADDRESS WORKFORCE SHORTAGES BY
ELIMINATING THE NECESSITY FOR LICENSES IN MULTIPLE STATES BY PROVIDING
FOR THE MUTUAL RECOGNITION OF OTHER MEMBER STATE LICENSES;
(6) SUPPORT MILITARY FAMILIES;
(7) FACILITATE THE EXCHANGE OF LICENSURE AND DISCIPLINARY
INFORMATION AMONG MEMBER STATES;
(8) AUTHORIZE ALL MEMBER STATES TO HOLD A REGULATED SOCIAL
WORKER ACCOUNTABLE FOR ABIDING BY A MEMBER STATE’S LAWS, REGULATIONS,
AND APPLICABLE PROFESSIONAL STANDARDS IN THE MEMBER STATE IN WHICH THE
CLIENT IS LOCATED AT THE TIME CARE IS RENDERED; AND
(9) ALLOW THE USE OF TELEHEALTH TO FACILITATE INCREASED
ACCESS TO REGULATED SOCIAL WORK SERVICES.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS.
AS USED IN THIS COMPACT, AND EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED, THE
FOLLOWING DEFINITIONS SHALL APPLY:
(1) “ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER” MEANS ANY INDIVIDUAL WITH
FULL–TIME DUTY STATUS IN THE ACTIVE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES,
INCLUDING MEMBERS OF THE NATIONAL GUARD AND RESERVE.
(2) “ADVERSE ACTION” MEANS ANY ADMINISTRATIVE, CIVIL,
EQUITABLE, OR CRIMINAL ACTION PERMITTED BY A STATE’S LAWS WHICH IS
IMPOSED BY A LICENSING AUTHORITY OR OTHER AUTHORITY AGAINST A
REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER, INCLUDING ACTIONS AGAINST AN INDIVIDUAL’S
LICENSE OR MULTISTATE AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE SUCH AS REVOCATION,
SUSPENSION, PROBATION, MONITORING OF THE LICENSEE, LIMITATION ON THE
LICENSEE’S PRACTICE, OR ANY OTHER ENCUMBRANCE ON LICENSURE AFFECTING A
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER’S AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE, INCLUDING
ISSUANCE OF A CEASE AND DESIST ACTION.
(3) “ALTERNATIVE PROGRAM” MEANS A NON–DISCIPLINARY
MONITORING OR PRACTICE REMEDIATION PROCESS APPROVED BY A LICENSING
AUTHORITY TO ADDRESS PRACTITIONERS WITH AN IMPAIRMENT.
(4) “CHARTER MEMBER STATES” MEANS MEMBER STATES WHO HAVE
ENACTED LEGISLATION TO ADOPT THIS COMPACT WHERE SUCH LEGISLATION
PREDATES THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS COMPACT AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 14.
(5) “COMPACT COMMISSION” OR “COMMISSION” MEANS THE
GOVERNMENT AGENCY WHOSE MEMBERSHIP CONSISTS OF ALL STATES THAT HAVE
ENACTED THIS COMPACT, WHICH IS KNOWN AS THE SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE
COMPACT COMMISSION, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 10, AND WHICH SHALL
OPERATE AS AN INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE MEMBER STATES.
(6) “CURRENT SIGNIFICANT INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION” MEANS:
(I) INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION THAT A LICENSING
AUTHORITY, AFTER A PRELIMINARY INQUIRY THAT INCLUDES NOTIFICATION AND
AN OPPORTUNITY FOR THE REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER TO RESPOND HAS REASON
TO BELIEVE IS NOT GROUNDLESS AND, IF PROVED TRUE, WOULD INDICATE MORE
THAN A MINOR INFRACTION AS MAY BE DEFINED BY THE COMMISSION; OR
(II) INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION THAT INDICATES THAT THE
REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER REPRESENTS AN IMMEDIATE THREAT TO PUBLIC
HEALTH AND SAFETY, AS MAY BE DEFINED BY THE COMMISSION, REGARDLESS OF
WHETHER THE REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER HAS BEEN NOTIFIED AND HAS HAD AN
OPPORTUNITY TO RESPOND.
(7) “DATA SYSTEM” MEANS A REPOSITORY OF INFORMATION ABOUT
LICENSEES, INCLUDING CONTINUING EDUCATION, EXAMINATION, LICENSURE,
CURRENT SIGNIFICANT INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION, DISQUALIFYING EVENT,
MULTISTATE LICENSE, AND ADVERSE ACTION INFORMATION OR OTHER
INFORMATION AS REQUIRED BY THE COMMISSION.
(8) “DISQUALIFYING EVENT” MEANS ANY ADVERSE ACTION OR
INCIDENT WHICH RESULTS IN AN ENCUMBRANCE THAT DISQUALIFIES OR MAKES
THE LICENSEE INELIGIBLE TO OBTAIN, RETAIN, OR RENEW A MULTISTATE LICENSE.
(9) “DOMICILE” MEANS THE JURISDICTION IN WHICH THE LICENSEE
RESIDES AND INTENDS TO REMAIN INDEFINITELY.
– 3 –

Ch. 10 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(10) “ENCUMBRANCE” MEANS A REVOCATION OR SUSPENSION OF, OR
ANY LIMITATION ON, THE FULL AND UNRESTRICTED PRACTICE OF SOCIAL WORK
LICENSED AND REGULATED BY A LICENSING AUTHORITY.
(11) “EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE” MEANS A GROUP OF DELEGATES
ELECTED OR APPOINTED TO ACT ON BEHALF OF, AND WITHIN THE POWERS
GRANTED TO THEM BY, THE COMPACT AND COMMISSION.
(12) “HOME STATE” MEANS THE MEMBER STATE THAT IS THE
LICENSEE’S PRIMARY DOMICILE.
(13) “IMPAIRMENT” MEANS A CONDITION THAT MAY IMPAIR A
PRACTITIONER’S ABILITY TO ENGAGE IN FULL AND UNRESTRICTED PRACTICE AS A
REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER WITHOUT SOME TYPE OF INTERVENTION AND MAY
INCLUDE ALCOHOL AND DRUG DEPENDENCE, MENTAL HEALTH IMPAIRMENT, AND
NEUROLOGICAL OR PHYSICAL IMPAIRMENTS.
(14) “LICENSEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO CURRENTLY HOLDS A
LICENSE FROM A STATE TO PRACTICE AS A REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER.
(15) “LICENSING AUTHORITY” MEANS THE BOARD OR AGENCY OF A
MEMBER STATE, OR EQUIVALENT, THAT IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE LICENSING AND
REGULATION OF REGULATED SOCIAL WORKERS.
(16) “MEMBER STATE” MEANS A STATE, COMMONWEALTH, DISTRICT,
OR TERRITORY OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA THAT HAS ENACTED THIS
COMPACT.
(17) “MULTISTATE AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE” MEANS A LEGALLY
AUTHORIZED PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE, WHICH IS EQUIVALENT TO A LICENSE,
ASSOCIATED WITH A MULTISTATE LICENSE PERMITTING THE PRACTICE OF SOCIAL
WORK IN A REMOTE STATE.
(18) “MULTISTATE LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE TO PRACTICE AS A
REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER ISSUED BY A HOME STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY
THAT AUTHORIZES THE REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER TO PRACTICE IN ALL MEMBER
STATES UNDER MULTISTATE AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE.
(19) “QUALIFYING NATIONAL EXAM” MEANS A NATIONAL LICENSING
EXAMINATION APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
(20) “REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER” MEANS ANY CLINICAL, MASTER’S,
OR BACHELOR’S SOCIAL WORKER LICENSED BY A MEMBER STATE REGARDLESS OF
THE TITLE USED BY THAT MEMBER STATE.
(21) “REMOTE STATE” MEANS A MEMBER STATE OTHER THAN THE
HOME STATE.
(22) “RULE” OR “RULE OF THE COMMISSION” MEANS A REGULATION
DULY PROMULGATED BY THE COMMISSION, AS AUTHORIZED BY THIS COMPACT,
THAT HAS THE FORCE OF LAW.
(23) “SINGLE STATE LICENSE” MEANS A SOCIAL WORK LICENSE
ISSUED BY ANY STATE THAT AUTHORIZES PRACTICE ONLY WITHIN THE ISSUING
STATE AND DOES NOT INCLUDE MULTISTATE AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE IN ANY
MEMBER STATE.
(24) “SOCIAL WORK” OR “SOCIAL WORK SERVICES” MEANS THE
APPLICATION OF SOCIAL WORK THEORY, KNOWLEDGE, METHODS, ETHICS, AND THE
PROFESSIONAL USE OF SELF TO RESTORE OR ENHANCE SOCIAL, PSYCHOSOCIAL, OR
BIOPSYCHOSOCIAL FUNCTIONING OF INDIVIDUALS, COUPLES, FAMILIES, GROUPS,
ORGANIZATIONS, AND COMMUNITIES THROUGH THE CARE AND SERVICES PROVIDED
BY A REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER AS SET FORTH IN THE MEMBER STATE’S
STATUTES AND REGULATIONS IN THE STATE WHERE THE SERVICES ARE BEING
PROVIDED.
(25) “STATE” MEANS ANY STATE, COMMONWEALTH, DISTRICT, OR
TERRITORY OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA THAT REGULATES THE PRACTICE
OF SOCIAL WORK.
(26) “UNENCUMBERED LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE THAT
AUTHORIZES A REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER TO ENGAGE IN THE FULL AND
UNRESTRICTED PRACTICE OF SOCIAL WORK.
SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT.
(A) TO BE ELIGIBLE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE COMPACT, A POTENTIAL
MEMBER STATE MUST CURRENTLY MEET ALL OF THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA:
(1) LICENSE AND REGULATE SOCIAL WORK AT EITHER THE CLINICAL,
MASTER’S OR BACHELOR’S CATEGORY;
(2) REQUIRE APPLICANTS FOR LICENSURE TO GRADUATE FROM A
PROGRAM THAT:
– 5 –

Ch. 10 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) IS OPERATED BY A COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY RECOGNIZED
BY THE LICENSING AUTHORITY;
(II) IS ACCREDITED, OR IN CANDIDACY BY AN INSTITUTION
THAT SUBSEQUENTLY BECOMES ACCREDITED, BY AN ACCREDITING AGENCY
RECOGNIZED BY EITHER:
1. THE COUNCIL FOR HIGHER EDUCATION
ACCREDITATION OR ITS SUCCESSOR; OR
2. THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION;
AND
(III) CORRESPONDS TO THE LICENSURE SOUGHT AS OUTLINED
IN SECTION 4;
(3) REQUIRE APPLICANTS FOR CLINICAL LICENSURE TO COMPLETE A
PERIOD OF SUPERVISED PRACTICE; AND
(4) HAVE A MECHANISM IN PLACE FOR RECEIVING, INVESTIGATING,
AND ADJUDICATING COMPLAINTS ABOUT LICENSEES.
(B) TO MAINTAIN MEMBERSHIP IN THE COMPACT A MEMBER STATE SHALL:
(1) REQUIRE THAT APPLICANTS FOR A MULTISTATE LICENSE PASS A
QUALIFYING NATIONAL EXAM FOR THE CORRESPONDING CATEGORY OF
MULTISTATE LICENSE SOUGHT AS OUTLINED IN SECTION 4;
(2) PARTICIPATE FULLY IN THE COMMISSION’S DATA SYSTEM,
INCLUDING USING THE COMMISSION’S UNIQUE IDENTIFIER AS DEFINED IN RULES;
(3) NOTIFY THE COMMISSION, IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE TERMS OF
THE COMPACT AND RULES, OF ANY ADVERSE ACTION OR THE AVAILABILITY OF
CURRENT SIGNIFICANT INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION REGARDING A LICENSEE;
(4) IMPLEMENT PROCEDURES FOR CONSIDERING THE CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORDS OF APPLICANTS FOR A MULTISTATE LICENSE. SUCH
PROCEDURES SHALL INCLUDE THE SUBMISSION OF FINGERPRINTS OR OTHER
BIOMETRIC–BASED INFORMATION BY APPLICANTS FOR THE PURPOSE OF
OBTAINING AN APPLICANT’S CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION FROM THE
FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION AND THE AGENCY RESPONSIBLE FOR
RETAINING THAT STATE’S CRIMINAL RECORDS;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
(5) COMPLY WITH THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION;
(6) REQUIRE AN APPLICANT TO OBTAIN OR RETAIN A LICENSE IN THE
HOME STATE AND MEET THE HOME STATE’S QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSURE OR
RENEWAL OF LICENSURE, AS WELL AS ALL OTHER APPLICABLE HOME STATE LAWS;
(7) AUTHORIZE A LICENSEE HOLDING A MULTISTATE LICENSE IN ANY
MEMBER STATE TO PRACTICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TERMS OF THE COMPACT
AND RULES OF THE COMMISSION; AND
(8) DESIGNATE A DELEGATE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE COMMISSION
MEETINGS.
(C) A MEMBER STATE MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTIONS 3(A) AND
3(B) OF THIS COMPACT SHALL DESIGNATE THE CATEGORIES OF SOCIAL WORK
LICENSURE THAT ARE ELIGIBLE FOR ISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE LICENSE FOR
APPLICANTS IN SUCH MEMBER STATE. TO THE EXTENT THAT ANY MEMBER STATE
DOES NOT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT AT ANY
PARTICULAR CATEGORY OF SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE, SUCH MEMBER STATE MAY
CHOOSE, BUT IS NOT OBLIGATED TO, ISSUE A MULTISTATE LICENSE TO APPLICANTS
THAT OTHERWISE MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 4 FOR ISSUANCE OF A
MULTISTATE LICENSE IN SUCH CATEGORY OR CATEGORIES OF LICENSURE.
(D) THE HOME STATES MAY CHARGE A FEE FOR GRANTING THE
MULTISTATE LICENSE.
SECTION 4. REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER PARTICIPATION IN THE
COMPACT.
(A) TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR A MULTISTATE LICENSE UNDER THE TERMS AND
PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT, AN APPLICANT, REGARDLESS OF CATEGORY MUST:
(1) HOLD OR BE ELIGIBLE FOR AN ACTIVE, UNENCUMBERED LICENSE
IN THE HOME STATE;
(2) PAY ANY APPLICABLE FEES, INCLUDING ANY STATE FEE, FOR THE
MULTISTATE LICENSE;
(3) SUBMIT, IN CONNECTION WITH AN APPLICATION FOR A
MULTISTATE LICENSE, FINGERPRINTS OR OTHER BIOMETRIC DATA FOR THE
PURPOSE OF OBTAINING CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION FROM THE
FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION AND THE AGENCY RESPONSIBLE FOR
RETAINING THAT STATE’S CRIMINAL RECORDS;
– 7 –

Ch. 10 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) NOTIFY THE HOME STATE OF ANY ADVERSE ACTION,
ENCUMBRANCE, OR RESTRICTION ON ANY PROFESSIONAL LICENSE TAKEN BY ANY
MEMBER STATE OR NON–MEMBER STATE WITHIN 30 DAYS FROM THE DATE THE
ACTION IS TAKEN;
(5) MEET ANY CONTINUING COMPETENCE REQUIREMENTS
ESTABLISHED BY THE HOME STATE; AND
(6) ABIDE BY THE LAWS, REGULATIONS, AND APPLICABLE
STANDARDS IN THE MEMBER STATE WHERE THE CLIENT IS LOCATED AT THE TIME
CARE IS RENDERED.
(B) AN APPLICANT FOR A CLINICAL–CATEGORY MULTISTATE LICENSE MUST
MEET ALL OF THE FOLLOWING REQUIREMENTS:
(1) FULFILL A COMPETENCY REQUIREMENT, WHICH SHALL BE
SATISFIED BY EITHER:
(I) PASSAGE OF A CLINICAL–CATEGORY QUALIFYING
NATIONAL EXAM;
(II) LICENSURE OF THE APPLICANT IN THEIR HOME STATE AT
THE CLINICAL CATEGORY, BEGINNING PRIOR TO SUCH TIME AS A QUALIFYING
NATIONAL EXAM WAS REQUIRED BY THE HOME STATE AND ACCOMPANIED BY A
PERIOD OF CONTINUOUS SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE THEREAFTER, ALL OF WHICH
MAY BE FURTHER GOVERNED BY THE RULE OF THE COMMISSION; OR
(III) THE SUBSTANTIAL EQUIVALENCY OF THE FOREGOING
COMPETENCY REQUIREMENTS WHICH THE COMMISSION MAY DETERMINE BY RULE.
(2) ATTAIN AT LEAST A MASTER’S DEGREE IN SOCIAL WORK FROM A
PROGRAM THAT IS:
(I) OPERATED BY A COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY RECOGNIZED BY
THE LICENSING AUTHORITY; AND
(II) ACCREDITED, OR IN CANDIDACY THAT SUBSEQUENTLY
BECOMES ACCREDITED, BY AN ACCREDITING AGENCY RECOGNIZED BY EITHER:
1. THE COUNCIL FOR HIGHER EDUCATION
ACCREDITATION OR ITS SUCCESSOR; OR
2. THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION;
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
(3) FULFILL A PRACTICE REQUIREMENT, WHICH SHALL BE SATISFIED
BY DEMONSTRATING COMPLETION OF EITHER:
(I) A PERIOD OF POSTGRADUATE SUPERVISED CLINICAL
PRACTICE EQUAL TO A MINIMUM OF THREE THOUSAND HOURS;
(II) A MINIMUM OF TWO YEARS OF FULL–TIME POSTGRADUATE
SUPERVISED CLINICAL PRACTICE; OR
(III) THE SUBSTANTIAL EQUIVALENCY OF THE FOREGOING
PRACTICE REQUIREMENTS WHICH THE COMMISSION MAY DETERMINE BY RULE.
(C) AN APPLICANT FOR A MASTER’S–CATEGORY MULTISTATE LICENSE
MUST MEET ALL OF THE FOLLOWING REQUIREMENTS:
(1) FULFILL A COMPETENCY REQUIREMENT, WHICH SHALL BE
SATISFIED BY EITHER:
(I) PASSAGE OF A MASTER’S–CATEGORY QUALIFYING
NATIONAL EXAM;
(II) LICENSURE OF THE APPLICANT IN THEIR HOME STATE AT
THE MASTER’S CATEGORY, BEGINNING PRIOR TO SUCH TIME AS A QUALIFYING
NATIONAL EXAM WAS REQUIRED BY THE HOME STATE AT THE MASTER’S CATEGORY
AND ACCOMPANIED BY A CONTINUOUS PERIOD OF SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE
THEREAFTER, ALL OF WHICH MAY BE FURTHER GOVERNED BY THE RULE OF THE
COMMISSION; OR
(III) THE SUBSTANTIAL EQUIVALENCY OF THE FOREGOING
COMPETENCY REQUIREMENTS WHICH THE COMMISSION MAY DETERMINE BY RULE.
(2) ATTAIN AT LEAST A MASTER’S DEGREE IN SOCIAL WORK, FROM A
PROGRAM THAT IS:
(I) OPERATED BY A COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY RECOGNIZED BY
THE LICENSING AUTHORITY; AND
(II) ACCREDITED, OR IN CANDIDACY THAT SUBSEQUENTLY
BECOMES ACCREDITED, BY AN ACCREDITING AGENCY RECOGNIZED BY EITHER:
1. THE COUNCIL FOR HIGHER EDUCATION
ACCREDITATION, OR ITS SUCCESSOR; OR
– 9 –

Ch. 10 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.
(D) AN APPLICANT FOR A BACHELOR’S–CATEGORY MULTISTATE LICENSE
MUST MEET ALL OF THE FOLLOWING REQUIREMENTS:
(1) FULFILL A COMPETENCY REQUIREMENT, WHICH SHALL BE
SATISFIED BY EITHER:
(I) PASSAGE OF A BACHELOR’S–CATEGORY QUALIFYING
NATIONAL EXAM;
(II) LICENSURE OF THE APPLICANT IN THEIR HOME STATE AT
THE BACHELOR’S CATEGORY, BEGINNING PRIOR TO SUCH TIME AS A QUALIFYING
NATIONAL EXAM WAS REQUIRED BY THE HOME STATE AND ACCOMPANIED BY A
CONTINUOUS PERIOD OF SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE THEREAFTER, ALL OF WHICH
MAY BE FURTHER GOVERNED BY THE RULE OF THE COMMISSION; OR
(III) THE SUBSTANTIAL EQUIVALENCY OF THE FOREGOING
COMPETENCY REQUIREMENTS WHICH THE COMMISSION MAY DETERMINE BY RULE;
AND
(2) ATTAIN AT LEAST A BACHELOR’S DEGREE IN SOCIAL WORK FROM
A PROGRAM THAT IS:
(I) OPERATED BY A COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY RECOGNIZED BY
THE LICENSING AUTHORITY; AND
(II) ACCREDITED, OR IN CANDIDACY THAT SUBSEQUENTLY
BECOMES ACCREDITED, BY AN ACCREDITING AGENCY RECOGNIZED BY EITHER:
1. THE COUNCIL FOR HIGHER EDUCATION
ACCREDITATION, OR ITS SUCCESSOR; OR
2. THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.
(E) THE MULTISTATE LICENSE FOR A REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER IS
SUBJECT TO THE RENEWAL REQUIREMENTS OF THE HOME STATE. THE REGULATED
SOCIAL WORKER MUST MAINTAIN COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SECTION 4(A) TO BE ELIGIBLE TO RENEW A MULTISTATE LICENSE.
(F) THE REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER’S SERVICES IN A REMOTE STATE ARE
SUBJECT TO THAT MEMBER STATE’S REGULATORY AUTHORITY. A REMOTE STATE
MAY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH DUE PROCESS AND THAT MEMBER STATE’S LAWS,
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
REMOVE A REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER’S MULTISTATE AUTHORIZATION TO
PRACTICE IN THE REMOTE STATE FOR A SPECIFIC PERIOD OF TIME, IMPOSE FINES,
AND TAKE ANY OTHER NECESSARY ACTIONS TO PROTECT THE HEALTH AND SAFETY
OF ITS CITIZENS.
(G) IF A MULTISTATE LICENSE IS ENCUMBERED, THE REGULATED SOCIAL
WORKER’S MULTISTATE AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE SHALL BE DEACTIVATED IN
ALL REMOTE STATES UNTIL THE MULTISTATE LICENSE IS NO LONGER
ENCUMBERED.
(H) IF A MULTISTATE AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE IS ENCUMBERED IN A
REMOTE STATE, THE REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER’S MULTISTATE AUTHORIZATION
TO PRACTICE MAY BE DEACTIVATED IN THAT STATE UNTIL THE MULTISTATE
AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE IS NO LONGER ENCUMBERED.
SECTION 5. ISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE LICENSE.
(A) UPON RECEIPT OF AN APPLICATION FOR A MULTISTATE LICENSE, THE
HOME STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL DETERMINE THE APPLICANT’S
ELIGIBILITY FOR A MULTISTATE LICENSE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 4 OF THIS
COMPACT.
(B) IF SUCH APPLICANT IS ELIGIBLE PURSUANT TO SECTION 4 OF THIS
COMPACT, THE HOME STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL ISSUE A MULTISTATE
LICENSE THAT AUTHORIZES THE APPLICANT OR REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER TO
PRACTICE IN ALL MEMBER STATES UNDER A MULTISTATE AUTHORIZATION TO
PRACTICE.
(C) UPON ISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE LICENSE, THE HOME STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL DESIGNATE WHETHER THE REGULATED SOCIAL
WORKER HOLDS A MULTISTATE LICENSE IN THE BACHELOR’S, MASTER’S, OR
CLINICAL CATEGORY OF SOCIAL WORK.
(D) A MULTISTATE LICENSE ISSUED BY A HOME STATE TO A RESIDENT IN
THAT STATE SHALL BE RECOGNIZED BY ALL COMPACT MEMBER STATES AS
AUTHORIZING SOCIAL WORK PRACTICE UNDER A MULTISTATE AUTHORIZATION TO
PRACTICE CORRESPONDING TO EACH CATEGORY OF LICENSURE REGULATED IN
EACH MEMBER STATE.
SECTION 6. AUTHORITY OF INTERSTATE COMPACT COMMISSION AND
MEMBER STATE LICENSING AUTHORITIES.
(A) NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT, NOR ANY RULE OF THE COMMISSION,
SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT, RESTRICT, OR IN ANY WAY REDUCE THE ABILITY
– 11 –

Ch. 10 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
OF A MEMBER STATE TO ENACT AND ENFORCE LAWS, REGULATIONS, OR OTHER
RULES RELATED TO THE PRACTICE OF SOCIAL WORK IN THAT STATE, WHERE THOSE
LAWS, REGULATIONS, OR OTHER RULES ARE NOT INCONSISTENT WITH THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS COMPACT.
(B) NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL AFFECT THE REQUIREMENTS
ESTABLISHED BY A MEMBER STATE FOR THE ISSUANCE OF A SINGLE STATE LICENSE.
(C) NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT, NOR ANY RULE OF THE COMMISSION,
SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT, RESTRICT, OR IN ANY WAY REDUCE THE ABILITY
OF A MEMBER STATE TO TAKE ADVERSE ACTION AGAINST A LICENSEE’S SINGLE
STATE LICENSE TO PRACTICE SOCIAL WORK IN THAT STATE.
(D) NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT, NOR ANY RULE OF THE COMMISSION,
SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT, RESTRICT, OR IN ANY WAY REDUCE THE ABILITY
OF A REMOTE STATE TO TAKE ADVERSE ACTION AGAINST A LICENSEE’S MULTISTATE
AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE IN THAT STATE.
(E) NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT, NOR ANY RULE OF THE COMMISSION,
SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT, RESTRICT, OR IN ANY WAY REDUCE THE ABILITY
OF A LICENSEE’S HOME STATE TO TAKE ADVERSE ACTION AGAINST A LICENSEE’S
MULTISTATE LICENSE BASED UPON INFORMATION PROVIDED BY A REMOTE STATE.
SECTION 7. REISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE LICENSE BY A NEW HOME
STATE.
(A) A LICENSEE CAN HOLD A MULTISTATE LICENSE, ISSUED BY THEIR HOME
STATE, IN ONLY ONE MEMBER STATE AT ANY GIVEN TIME.
(B) IF A LICENSEE CHANGES THEIR HOME STATE BY MOVING BETWEEN TWO
MEMBER STATES:
(1) THE LICENSEE SHALL IMMEDIATELY APPLY FOR THE REISSUANCE
OF THEIR MULTISTATE LICENSE IN THEIR NEW HOME STATE. THE LICENSEE SHALL
PAY ALL APPLICABLE FEES AND NOTIFY THE PRIOR HOME STATE IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION.
(2) UPON RECEIPT OF AN APPLICATION TO REISSUE A MULTISTATE
LICENSE, THE NEW HOME STATE SHALL VERIFY THAT THE MULTISTATE LICENSE IS
ACTIVE, UNENCUMBERED AND ELIGIBLE FOR REISSUANCE UNDER THE TERMS OF
THE COMPACT AND THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION. THE MULTISTATE LICENSE
ISSUED BY THE PRIOR HOME STATE WILL BE DEACTIVATED AND ALL MEMBER
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
STATES NOTIFIED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE APPLICABLE RULES ADOPTED BY THE
COMMISSION.
(3) PRIOR TO THE REISSUANCE OF THE MULTISTATE LICENSE, THE
NEW HOME STATE SHALL CONDUCT PROCEDURES FOR CONSIDERING THE CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORDS OF THE LICENSEE. SUCH PROCEDURES SHALL INCLUDE THE
SUBMISSION OF FINGERPRINTS OR OTHER BIOMETRIC–BASED INFORMATION BY
APPLICANTS FOR THE PURPOSE OF OBTAINING AN APPLICANT’S CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORD INFORMATION FROM THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION AND THE
AGENCY RESPONSIBLE FOR RETAINING THAT STATE’S CRIMINAL RECORDS.
(4) IF REQUIRED FOR INITIAL LICENSURE, THE NEW HOME STATE
MAY REQUIRE COMPLETION OF JURISPRUDENCE REQUIREMENTS IN THE NEW HOME
STATE.
(5) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS COMPACT, IF
A LICENSEE DOES NOT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN THIS COMPACT FOR
THE REISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE LICENSE BY THE NEW HOME STATE, THEN THE
LICENSEE SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE NEW HOME STATE REQUIREMENTS FOR THE
ISSUANCE OF A SINGLE STATE LICENSE IN THAT STATE.
(C) IF A LICENSEE CHANGES THEIR PRIMARY STATE OF RESIDENCE BY
MOVING FROM A MEMBER STATE TO A NON–MEMBER STATE, OR FROM A
NON–MEMBER STATE TO A MEMBER STATE, THEN THE LICENSEE SHALL BE SUBJECT
TO THE STATE REQUIREMENTS FOR THE ISSUANCE OF A SINGLE STATE LICENSE IN
THE NEW HOME STATE.
(D) NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL INTERFERE WITH A LICENSEE’S
ABILITY TO HOLD A SINGLE STATE LICENSE IN MULTIPLE STATES; HOWEVER, FOR
THE PURPOSES OF THIS COMPACT, A LICENSEE SHALL HAVE ONLY ONE HOME
STATE, AND ONLY ONE MULTISTATE LICENSE.
(E) NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL INTERFERE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY A MEMBER STATE FOR THE ISSUANCE OF A SINGLE
STATE LICENSE.
SECTION 8. MILITARY FAMILIES.
AN ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER OR THEIR SPOUSE SHALL DESIGNATE A HOME
STATE WHERE THE INDIVIDUAL HAS A MULTISTATE LICENSE. THE INDIVIDUAL MAY
RETAIN THEIR HOME STATE DESIGNATION DURING THE PERIOD THE SERVICE
MEMBER IS ON ACTIVE DUTY.
SECTION 9. ADVERSE ACTIONS.
– 13 –

Ch. 10 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) IN ADDITION TO THE OTHER POWERS CONFERRED BY STATE LAW, A
REMOTE STATE SHALL HAVE THE AUTHORITY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH EXISTING
STATE DUE PROCESS LAW, TO:
(1) TAKE ADVERSE ACTION AGAINST A REGULATED SOCIAL
WORKER’S MULTISTATE AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE ONLY WITHIN THAT MEMBER
STATE, AND ISSUE SUBPOENAS FOR BOTH HEARINGS AND INVESTIGATIONS THAT
REQUIRE THE ATTENDANCE AND TESTIMONY OF WITNESSES AS WELL AS THE
PRODUCTION OF EVIDENCE. SUBPOENAS ISSUED BY A LICENSING AUTHORITY IN A
MEMBER STATE FOR THE ATTENDANCE AND TESTIMONY OF WITNESSES OR THE
PRODUCTION OF EVIDENCE FROM ANOTHER MEMBER STATE SHALL BE ENFORCED
IN THE LATTER STATE BY ANY COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION, ACCORDING
TO THE PRACTICE AND PROCEDURE OF THAT COURT APPLICABLE TO SUBPOENAS
ISSUED IN PROCEEDINGS PENDING BEFORE IT. THE ISSUING AUTHORITY SHALL PAY
ANY WITNESS FEES, TRAVEL EXPENSES, MILEAGE AND OTHER FEES REQUIRED BY
THE SERVICE STATUTES OF THE STATE IN WHICH THE WITNESSES OR EVIDENCE ARE
LOCATED.
(2) ONLY THE HOME STATE SHALL HAVE THE POWER TO TAKE
ADVERSE ACTION AGAINST A REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER’S MULTISTATE LICENSE.
(B) FOR PURPOSES OF TAKING ADVERSE ACTION, THE HOME STATE SHALL
GIVE THE SAME PRIORITY AND EFFECT TO REPORTED CONDUCT RECEIVED FROM A
MEMBER STATE AS IT WOULD IF THE CONDUCT HAD OCCURRED WITHIN THE HOME
STATE. IN SO DOING, THE HOME STATE SHALL APPLY ITS OWN STATE LAWS TO
DETERMINE APPROPRIATE ACTION.
(C) THE HOME STATE SHALL COMPLETE ANY PENDING INVESTIGATIONS OF
A REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER WHO CHANGES THEIR HOME STATE DURING THE
COURSE OF THE INVESTIGATIONS. THE HOME STATE SHALL ALSO HAVE THE
AUTHORITY TO TAKE APPROPRIATE ACTION(S) AND SHALL PROMPTLY REPORT THE
CONCLUSIONS OF THE INVESTIGATIONS TO THE ADMINISTRATOR OF THE DATA
SYSTEM. THE ADMINISTRATOR OF THE DATA SYSTEM SHALL PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE
NEW HOME STATE OF ANY ADVERSE ACTIONS.
(D) A MEMBER STATE, IF OTHERWISE PERMITTED BY STATE LAW, MAY
RECOVER FROM THE AFFECTED REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER THE COSTS OF
INVESTIGATIONS AND DISPOSITIONS OF CASES RESULTING FROM ANY ADVERSE
ACTION TAKEN AGAINST THAT REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
(E) A MEMBER STATE MAY TAKE ADVERSE ACTION BASED ON THE FACTUAL
FINDINGS OF ANOTHER MEMBER STATE, PROVIDED THAT THE MEMBER STATE
FOLLOWS ITS OWN PROCEDURES FOR TAKING ADVERSE ACTION.
(F) (1) IN ADDITION TO THE AUTHORITY GRANTED TO A MEMBER STATE
BY ITS RESPECTIVE REGULATED SOCIAL WORK PRACTICE ACT OR OTHER
APPLICABLE STATE LAW, ANY MEMBER STATE MAY PARTICIPATE WITH OTHER
MEMBER STATES IN JOINT INVESTIGATIONS OF LICENSEES.
(2) MEMBER STATES SHALL SHARE ANY INVESTIGATIVE, LITIGATION,
OR COMPLIANCE MATERIALS IN FURTHERANCE OF ANY JOINT OR INDIVIDUAL
INVESTIGATION INITIATED UNDER THE COMPACT.
(G) IF AN ADVERSE ACTION IS TAKEN BY THE HOME STATE AGAINST THE
MULTISTATE LICENSE OF A REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER, THE REGULATED SOCIAL
WORKER’S MULTISTATE AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE IN ALL OTHER MEMBER
STATES SHALL BE DEACTIVATED UNTIL ALL ENCUMBRANCES HAVE BEEN REMOVED
FROM THE MULTISTATE LICENSE. ALL HOME STATE DISCIPLINARY ORDERS THAT
IMPOSE ADVERSE ACTION AGAINST THE LICENSE OF A REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER
SHALL INCLUDE A STATEMENT THAT THE REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER’S
MULTISTATE AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE IS DEACTIVATED IN ALL MEMBER
STATES UNTIL ALL CONDITIONS OF THE DECISION, ORDER, OR AGREEMENT ARE
SATISFIED.
(H) IF A MEMBER STATE TAKES ADVERSE ACTION, IT SHALL PROMPTLY
NOTIFY THE ADMINISTRATOR OF THE DATA SYSTEM. THE ADMINISTRATOR OF THE
DATA SYSTEM SHALL PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE HOME STATE AND ALL OTHER MEMBER
STATES OF ANY ADVERSE ACTIONS BY REMOTE STATES.
(I) NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL OVERRIDE A MEMBER STATE’S
DECISION THAT PARTICIPATION IN AN ALTERNATIVE PROGRAM MAY BE USED IN
LIEU OF ADVERSE ACTION.
(J) NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL AUTHORIZE A MEMBER STATE TO
DEMAND THE ISSUANCE OF SUBPOENAS FOR ATTENDANCE AND TESTIMONY OF
WITNESSES OR THE PRODUCTION OF EVIDENCE FROM ANOTHER MEMBER STATE
FOR LAWFUL ACTIONS WITHIN THAT MEMBER STATE.
(K) NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL AUTHORIZE A MEMBER STATE TO
IMPOSE DISCIPLINE AGAINST A REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER WHO HOLDS A
MULTISTATE AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE FOR LAWFUL ACTIONS WITHIN
ANOTHER MEMBER STATE.
– 15 –

Ch. 10 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 10. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE
COMPACT COMMISSION.
(A) THE COMPACT MEMBER STATES HEREBY CREATE AND ESTABLISH A
JOINT GOVERNMENT AGENCY WHOSE MEMBERSHIP CONSISTS OF ALL MEMBER
STATES THAT HAVE ENACTED THE COMPACT KNOWN AS THE SOCIAL WORK
LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION. THE COMMISSION IS AN INSTRUMENTALITY
OF THE COMPACT STATES ACTING JOINTLY AND NOT AN INSTRUMENTALITY OF ANY
ONE STATE. THE COMMISSION SHALL COME INTO EXISTENCE ON OR AFTER THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE COMPACT AS SET FORTH IN SECTION 14.
(B) (1) EACH MEMBER STATE SHALL HAVE AND BE LIMITED TO ONE
DELEGATE SELECTED BY THAT MEMBER STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY.
(2) THE DELEGATE SHALL BE EITHER:
(I) A CURRENT MEMBER OF THE LICENSING AUTHORITY AT
THE TIME OF APPOINTMENT, WHO IS A REGULATED SOCIAL WORKER, OR PUBLIC
MEMBER OF THE LICENSING AUTHORITY; OR
(II) AN ADMINISTRATOR OF THE LICENSING AUTHORITY OR
THEIR DESIGNEE.
(3) THE COMMISSION SHALL BY RULE OR BYLAW ESTABLISH A TERM
OF OFFICE FOR DELEGATES AND MAY BY RULE OR BYLAW ESTABLISH TERM LIMITS.
(4) THE COMMISSION MAY RECOMMEND REMOVAL OR SUSPENSION
OF ANY DELEGATE FROM OFFICE.
(5) A MEMBER STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL FILL ANY
VACANCY OF ITS DELEGATE OCCURRING ON THE COMMISSION WITHIN 60 DAYS OF
THE VACANCY.
(6) EACH DELEGATE SHALL BE ENTITLED TO ONE VOTE ON ALL
MATTERS BEFORE THE COMMISSION REQUIRING A VOTE BY COMMISSION
DELEGATES.
(7) A DELEGATE SHALL VOTE IN PERSON OR BY SUCH OTHER MEANS
AS PROVIDED IN THE BYLAWS. THE BYLAWS MAY PROVIDE FOR DELEGATES TO MEET
BY TELECOMMUNICATION, VIDEO CONFERENCE, OR OTHER MEANS OF
COMMUNICATION.
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
(8) THE COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT LEAST ONCE DURING EACH
CALENDAR YEAR. ADDITIONAL MEETINGS MAY BE HELD AS SET FORTH IN THE
BYLAWS. THE COMMISSION MAY MEET BY TELECOMMUNICATION, VIDEO
CONFERENCE, OR OTHER SIMILAR ELECTRONIC MEANS.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING POWERS:
(1) ESTABLISH THE FISCAL YEAR OF THE COMMISSION;
(2) ESTABLISH A CODE OF CONDUCT AND CONFLICT OF INTEREST
POLICIES;
(3) ESTABLISH AND AMEND RULES AND BYLAWS;
(4) MAINTAIN ITS FINANCIAL RECORDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
BYLAWS;
(5) MEET AND TAKE SUCH ACTIONS AS ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE
PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT, THE COMMISSION’S RULES AND BYLAWS;
(6) INITIATE AND CONCLUDE LEGAL PROCEEDINGS OR ACTIONS IN
THE NAME OF THE COMMISSION, PROVIDED THAT THE STANDING OF ANY STATE
LICENSING BOARD TO SUE OR BE SUED UNDER APPLICABLE LAW SHALL NOT BE
AFFECTED;
(7) MAINTAIN AND CERTIFY RECORDS AND INFORMATION PROVIDED
TO A MEMBER STATE AS THE AUTHENTICATED BUSINESS RECORDS OF THE
COMMISSION AND DESIGNATE AN AGENT TO DO SO ON THE COMMISSION’S BEHALF;
(8) PURCHASE AND MAINTAIN INSURANCE AND BONDS;
(9) BORROW, ACCEPT, OR CONTRACT FOR SERVICES OF PERSONNEL,
INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, EMPLOYEES OF A MEMBER STATE;
(10) CONDUCT AN ANNUAL FINANCIAL REVIEW;
(11) HIRE EMPLOYEES, ELECT OR APPOINT OFFICERS, FIX
COMPENSATION, DEFINE DUTIES, GRANT SUCH INDIVIDUALS APPROPRIATE
AUTHORITY TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THE COMPACT, AND ESTABLISH THE
COMMISSION’S PERSONNEL POLICIES AND PROGRAMS RELATING TO CONFLICTS OF
INTEREST, QUALIFICATIONS OF PERSONNEL, AND OTHER RELATED PERSONNEL
MATTERS;
(12) ASSESS AND COLLECT FEES;
– 17 –

Ch. 10 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(13) ACCEPT ANY AND ALL APPROPRIATE GIFTS, DONATIONS, GRANTS
OF MONEY, OTHER SOURCES OF REVENUE, EQUIPMENT, SUPPLIES, MATERIALS AND
SERVICES, AND TO RECEIVE, UTILIZE AND DISPOSE OF THE SAME; PROVIDED THAT
AT ALL TIMES THE COMMISSION SHALL AVOID ANY APPEARANCE OF IMPROPRIETY
OR CONFLICT OF INTEREST;
(14) LEASE, PURCHASE, RETAIN, OR OTHERWISE TO OWN, HOLD,
IMPROVE OR USE ANY PROPERTY, REAL, PERSONAL OR MIXED; OR ANY UNDIVIDED
INTEREST THEREIN;
(15) SELL, CONVEY, MORTGAGE, PLEDGE, LEASE, EXCHANGE,
ABANDON, OR OTHERWISE DISPOSE OF ANY PROPERTY REAL, PERSONAL, OR MIXED;
(16) ESTABLISH A BUDGET AND MAKE EXPENDITURES;
(17) BORROW MONEY;
(18) APPOINT COMMITTEES, INCLUDING STANDING COMMITTEES
COMPOSED OF MEMBERS, STATE REGULATORS, STATE LEGISLATORS OR THEIR
REPRESENTATIVES, AND CONSUMER REPRESENTATIVES, AND SUCH OTHER
INTERESTED PERSONS AS MAY BE DESIGNATED IN THE COMPACT AND THE BYLAWS;
(19) PROVIDE AND RECEIVE INFORMATION FROM, AND COOPERATE
WITH, LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES;
(20) ESTABLISH AND ELECT AN EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE, INCLUDING A
CHAIR AND VICE CHAIR;
(21) DETERMINE WHETHER A STATE’S ADOPTED LANGUAGE IS
MATERIALLY DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL COMPACT LANGUAGE SUCH THAT THE
STATE WOULD NOT QUALIFY FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT; AND
(22) PERFORM SUCH OTHER FUNCTIONS AS MAY BE NECESSARY OR
APPROPRIATE TO ACHIEVE THE PURPOSES OF THE COMPACT.
(D) (1) THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL HAVE THE POWER TO ACT ON
BEHALF OF THE COMMISSION ACCORDING TO THE TERMS OF THE COMPACT. THE
POWERS, DUTIES, AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL
INCLUDE:
(I) OVERSEEING THE DAY–TO–DAY ACTIVITIES OF THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THE COMPACT INCLUDING ENFORCEMENT AND COMPLIANCE
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT, ITS RULES AND BYLAWS, AND OTHER SUCH
DUTIES AS DEEMED NECESSARY;
(II) RECOMMENDING TO THE COMMISSION CHANGES TO THE
RULES OR BYLAWS, CHANGES TO THIS COMPACT LEGISLATION, FEES CHARGED TO
COMPACT MEMBER STATES SUCH AS FEES CHARGED TO LICENSEES, AND OTHER
FEES;
(III) ENSURING COMPACT ADMINISTRATION SERVICES ARE
APPROPRIATELY PROVIDED, INCLUDING BY CONTRACT;
(IV) PREPARING AND RECOMMENDING THE BUDGET;
(V) MAINTAINING FINANCIAL RECORDS ON BEHALF OF THE
COMMISSION;
(VI) MONITORING COMPACT COMPLIANCE OF MEMBER STATES
AND PROVIDING COMPLIANCE REPORTS TO THE COMMISSION;
(VII) ESTABLISHING ADDITIONAL COMMITTEES AS NECESSARY;
(VIII) EXERCISING THE POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE
COMMISSION DURING THE INTERIM BETWEEN COMMISSION MEETINGS, EXCEPT
FOR ADOPTING OR AMENDING RULES, ADOPTING OR AMENDING BYLAWS, AND
EXERCISING ANY OTHER POWERS AND DUTIES EXPRESSLY RESERVED TO THE
COMMISSION BY RULE OR BYLAW; AND
(IX) OTHER DUTIES AS PROVIDED IN THE RULES OR BYLAWS OF
THE COMMISSION.
(2) THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL BE COMPOSED OF UP TO
ELEVEN MEMBERS:
(I) THE CHAIR AND VICE CHAIR OF THE COMMISSION SHALL BE
VOTING MEMBERS OF THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE;
(II) THE COMMISSION SHALL ELECT FIVE VOTING MEMBERS
FROM THE CURRENT MEMBERSHIP OF THE COMMISSION;
(III) UP TO FOUR EX OFFICIO, NONVOTING MEMBERS FROM
FOUR RECOGNIZED NATIONAL SOCIAL WORKER ORGANIZATIONS;
(IV) THE EX OFFICIO MEMBERS WILL BE SELECTED BY THEIR
RESPECTIVE ORGANIZATIONS.
– 19 –

Ch. 10 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) THE COMMISSION MAY REMOVE ANY MEMBER OF THE EXECUTIVE
COMMITTEE AS PROVIDED IN THE COMMISSION’S BYLAWS.
(4) THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL MEET AT LEAST ANNUALLY.
(I) EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE MEETINGS SHALL BE OPEN TO THE
PUBLIC, EXCEPT THAT THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE MAY MEET IN A CLOSED,
NON–PUBLIC MEETING AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F)(2) BELOW.
(II) THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL GIVE SEVEN DAYS’
NOTICE OF ITS MEETINGS, POSTED ON ITS WEBSITE AND AS DETERMINED TO
PROVIDE NOTICE TO PERSONS WITH AN INTEREST IN THE BUSINESS OF THE
COMMISSION.
(III) THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE MAY HOLD A SPECIAL
MEETING IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F)(1)(II) BELOW.
(E) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT AND PROVIDE TO THE MEMBER STATES
AN ANNUAL REPORT.
(F) (1) ALL MEETINGS SHALL BE OPEN TO THE PUBLIC, EXCEPT THAT
THE COMMISSION MAY MEET IN A CLOSED, NON–PUBLIC MEETING AS PROVIDED IN
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION BELOW.
(I) PUBLIC NOTICE FOR ALL MEETINGS OF THE FULL
COMMISSION SHALL BE GIVEN IN THE SAME MANNER AS REQUIRED UNDER THE
RULEMAKING PROVISIONS IN SECTION 12, EXCEPT THAT THE COMMISSION MAY
HOLD A SPECIAL MEETING AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH BELOW.
(II) THE COMMISSION MAY HOLD A SPECIAL MEETING WHEN IT
MUST MEET TO CONDUCT EMERGENCY BUSINESS BY GIVING 48 HOURS’ NOTICE TO
ALL COMMISSIONERS, ON THE COMMISSION’S WEBSITE, AND OTHER MEANS AS
PROVIDED IN THE COMMISSION’S RULES. THE COMMISSION’S LEGAL COUNSEL
SHALL CERTIFY THAT THE COMMISSION’S NEED TO MEET QUALIFIES AS AN
EMERGENCY.
(2) THE COMMISSION OR THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OR OTHER
COMMITTEES OF THE COMMISSION MAY CONVENE IN A CLOSED, NON–PUBLIC
MEETING FOR THE COMMISSION OR EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OR OTHER
COMMITTEES OF THE COMMISSION TO RECEIVE LEGAL ADVICE OR TO DISCUSS:
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
(I) NON–COMPLIANCE OF A MEMBER STATE WITH ITS
OBLIGATIONS UNDER THE COMPACT;
(II) THE EMPLOYMENT, COMPENSATION, DISCIPLINE OR OTHER
MATTERS, PRACTICES OR PROCEDURES RELATED TO SPECIFIC EMPLOYEES;
(III) CURRENT OR THREATENED DISCIPLINE OF A LICENSEE BY
THE COMMISSION OR BY A MEMBER STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY;
(IV) CURRENT, THREATENED, OR REASONABLY ANTICIPATED
LITIGATION;
(V) NEGOTIATION OF CONTRACTS FOR THE PURCHASE, LEASE,
OR SALE OF GOODS, SERVICES, OR REAL ESTATE;
(VI) ACCUSING ANY PERSON OF A CRIME OR FORMALLY
CENSURING ANY PERSON;
(VII) TRADE SECRETS OR COMMERCIAL OR FINANCIAL
INFORMATION THAT IS PRIVILEGED OR CONFIDENTIAL;
(VIII) INFORMATION OF A PERSONAL NATURE WHERE
DISCLOSURE WOULD CONSTITUTE A CLEARLY UNWARRANTED INVASION OF
PERSONAL PRIVACY;
(IX) INVESTIGATIVE RECORDS COMPILED FOR LAW
ENFORCEMENT PURPOSES;
(X) INFORMATION RELATED TO ANY INVESTIGATIVE REPORTS
PREPARED BY OR ON BEHALF OF OR FOR USE OF THE COMMISSION OR OTHER
COMMITTEE CHARGED WITH RESPONSIBILITY OF INVESTIGATION OR
DETERMINATION OF COMPLIANCE ISSUES PURSUANT TO THE COMPACT;
(XI) MATTERS SPECIFICALLY EXEMPTED FROM DISCLOSURE BY
FEDERAL OR MEMBER STATE LAW; OR
(XII) OTHER MATTERS AS PROMULGATED BY THE COMMISSION
BY RULE.
(3) IF A MEETING, OR PORTION OF A MEETING, IS CLOSED, THE
PRESIDING OFFICER SHALL STATE THAT THE MEETING WILL BE CLOSED AND
REFERENCE EACH RELEVANT EXEMPTING PROVISION, AND SUCH REFERENCES
SHALL BE RECORDED IN THE MINUTES.
– 21 –

Ch. 10 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) THE COMMISSION SHALL KEEP MINUTES THAT FULLY AND
CLEARLY DESCRIBE ALL MATTERS DISCUSSED IN A MEETING AND SHALL PROVIDE A
FULL AND ACCURATE SUMMARY OF ACTIONS TAKEN, AND THE REASONS THEREFOR
THEREFORE, INCLUDING A DESCRIPTION OF THE VIEWS EXPRESSED. ALL
DOCUMENTS CONSIDERED IN CONNECTION WITH AN ACTION SHALL BE IDENTIFIED
IN SUCH MINUTES. ALL MINUTES AND DOCUMENTS OF A CLOSED MEETING SHALL
REMAIN UNDER SEAL, SUBJECT TO RELEASE ONLY BY A MAJORITY VOTE OF THE
COMMISSION OR ORDER OF A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION.
(G) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL PAY, OR PROVIDE FOR THE PAYMENT
OF, THE REASONABLE EXPENSES OF ITS ESTABLISHMENT, ORGANIZATION, AND
ONGOING ACTIVITIES.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY ACCEPT ANY AND ALL APPROPRIATE
REVENUE SOURCES, AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C)(13) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) THE COMMISSION MAY LEVY ON AND COLLECT AN ANNUAL
ASSESSMENT FROM EACH MEMBER STATE AND IMPOSE FEES ON LICENSEES OF
MEMBER STATES TO WHOM IT GRANTS A MULTISTATE LICENSE TO COVER THE COST
OF THE OPERATIONS AND ACTIVITIES OF THE COMMISSION AND ITS STAFF, WHICH
MUST BE IN A TOTAL AMOUNT SUFFICIENT TO COVER ITS ANNUAL BUDGET AS
APPROVED EACH YEAR FOR WHICH REVENUE IS NOT PROVIDED BY OTHER SOURCES.
THE AGGREGATE ANNUAL ASSESSMENT AMOUNT FOR MEMBER STATES SHALL BE
ALLOCATED BASED UPON A FORMULA THAT THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE
BY RULE.
(4) THE COMMISSION SHALL NOT INCUR OBLIGATIONS OF ANY KIND
PRIOR TO SECURING THE FUNDS ADEQUATE TO MEET THE SAME; NOR SHALL THE
COMMISSION PLEDGE THE CREDIT OF ANY OF THE MEMBER STATES, EXCEPT BY AND
WITH THE AUTHORITY OF THE MEMBER STATE.
(5) THE COMMISSION SHALL KEEP ACCURATE ACCOUNTS OF ALL
RECEIPTS AND DISBURSEMENTS. THE RECEIPTS AND DISBURSEMENTS OF THE
COMMISSION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE FINANCIAL REVIEW AND ACCOUNTING
PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED UNDER ITS BYLAWS. HOWEVER, ALL RECEIPTS AND
DISBURSEMENTS OF FUNDS HANDLED BY THE COMMISSION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO
AN ANNUAL FINANCIAL REVIEW BY A CERTIFIED OR LICENSED PUBLIC
ACCOUNTANT, AND THE REPORT OF THE FINANCIAL REVIEW SHALL BE INCLUDED IN
AND BECOME PART OF THE ANNUAL REPORT OF THE COMMISSION.
(H) (1) THE MEMBERS, OFFICERS, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, EMPLOYEES
AND REPRESENTATIVES OF THE COMMISSION SHALL BE IMMUNE FROM SUIT AND
LIABILITY, BOTH PERSONALLY AND IN THEIR OFFICIAL CAPACITY, FOR ANY CLAIM
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
FOR DAMAGE TO OR LOSS OF PROPERTY OR PERSONAL INJURY OR OTHER CIVIL
LIABILITY CAUSED BY OR ARISING OUT OF ANY ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR OR
OMISSION THAT OCCURRED, OR THAT THE PERSON AGAINST WHOM THE CLAIM IS
MADE HAD A REASONABLE BASIS FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF
COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES OR RESPONSIBILITIES; PROVIDED THAT
NOTHING IN THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROTECT ANY SUCH
PERSON FROM SUIT OR LIABILITY FOR ANY DAMAGE, LOSS, INJURY, OR LIABILITY
CAUSED BY THE INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL OR WANTON MISCONDUCT OF THAT
PERSON. THE PROCUREMENT OF INSURANCE OF ANY TYPE BY THE COMMISSION
SHALL NOT IN ANY WAY COMPROMISE OR LIMIT THE IMMUNITY GRANTED
HEREUNDER.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL DEFEND ANY MEMBER, OFFICER,
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, EMPLOYEE, AND REPRESENTATIVE OF THE COMMISSION IN
ANY CIVIL ACTION SEEKING TO IMPOSE LIABILITY ARISING OUT OF ANY ACTUAL OR
ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR OMISSION THAT OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF
COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, OR AS DETERMINED BY
THE COMMISSION THAT THE PERSON AGAINST WHOM THE CLAIM IS MADE HAD A
REASONABLE BASIS FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF
COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES; PROVIDED THAT
NOTHING HEREIN SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT THAT PERSON FROM
RETAINING THEIR OWN COUNSEL AT THEIR EXPENSE; AND PROVIDED FURTHER,
THAT THE ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR OMISSION DID NOT RESULT FROM
THAT PERSON’S INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL OR WANTON MISCONDUCT.
(3) THE COMMISSION SHALL INDEMNIFY AND HOLD HARMLESS ANY
MEMBER, OFFICER, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, EMPLOYEE, AND REPRESENTATIVE OF
THE COMMISSION FOR THE AMOUNT OF ANY SETTLEMENT OR JUDGMENT OBTAINED
AGAINST THAT PERSON ARISING OUT OF ANY ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR OR
OMISSION THAT OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT,
DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, OR THAT SUCH PERSON HAD A REASONABLE BASIS
FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT,
DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, PROVIDED THAT THE ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT,
ERROR, OR OMISSION DID NOT RESULT FROM THE INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL OR
WANTON MISCONDUCT OF THAT PERSON.
(4) NOTHING HEREIN SHALL BE CONSTRUED AS A LIMITATION ON
THE LIABILITY OF ANY LICENSEE FOR PROFESSIONAL MALPRACTICE OR
MISCONDUCT, WHICH SHALL BE GOVERNED SOLELY BY ANY OTHER APPLICABLE
STATE LAWS.
(5) NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE INTERPRETED TO WAIVE
OR OTHERWISE ABROGATE A MEMBER STATE’S ACTION IMMUNITY OR STATE ACTION
– 23 –

Ch. 10 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE WITH RESPECT TO ANTITRUST CLAIMS UNDER THE
SHERMAN ACT, CLAYTON ACT, OR ANY OTHER STATE OR FEDERAL ANTITRUST OR
ANTICOMPETITIVE LAW OR REGULATION.
(6) NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO BE A
WAIVER OF SOVEREIGN IMMUNITY BY THE MEMBER STATES OR BY THE
COMMISSION.
SECTION 11. DATA SYSTEM.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE FOR THE DEVELOPMENT,
MAINTENANCE, OPERATION, AND UTILIZATION OF A COORDINATED DATA SYSTEM.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL ASSIGN EACH APPLICANT FOR A MULTISTATE
LICENSE A UNIQUE IDENTIFIER, AS DETERMINED BY THE RULES OF THE
COMMISSION.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF STATE LAW TO THE
CONTRARY, A MEMBER STATE SHALL SUBMIT A UNIFORM DATA SET TO THE DATA
SYSTEM ON ALL INDIVIDUALS TO WHOM THIS COMPACT IS APPLICABLE AS
REQUIRED BY THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION, INCLUDING:
(1) IDENTIFYING INFORMATION;
(2) LICENSURE DATA;
(3) ADVERSE ACTIONS AGAINST A LICENSE AND INFORMATION
RELATED THERETO;
(4) NON–CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION RELATED TO ALTERNATIVE
PROGRAM PARTICIPATION, THE BEGINNING AND END DATES OF SUCH
PARTICIPATION, AND OTHER INFORMATION RELATED TO SUCH PARTICIPATION NOT
MADE CONFIDENTIAL UNDER MEMBER STATE LAW;
(5) ANY DENIAL OF APPLICATION FOR LICENSURE, AND THE
REASON(S) FOR SUCH DENIAL;
(6) THE PRESENCE OF CURRENT SIGNIFICANT INVESTIGATIVE
INFORMATION; AND
(7) OTHER INFORMATION THAT MAY FACILITATE THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THIS COMPACT, AS DETERMINED BY THE RULES OF THE
COMMISSION.
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
(D) THE RECORDS AND INFORMATION PROVIDED TO A MEMBER STATE
PURSUANT TO THIS COMPACT OR THROUGH THE DATA SYSTEM, WHEN CERTIFIED
BY THE COMMISSION OR AN AGENT THEREOF, SHALL CONSTITUTE THE
AUTHENTICATED BUSINESS RECORDS OF THE COMMISSION, AND SHALL BE
ENTITLED TO ANY ASSOCIATED HEARSAY EXCEPTION IN ANY RELEVANT JUDICIAL,
QUASI–JUDICIAL OR ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDINGS IN A MEMBER STATE.
(E) CURRENT SIGNIFICANT INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION PERTAINING TO
A LICENSEE IN ANY MEMBER STATE WILL ONLY BE AVAILABLE TO OTHER MEMBER
STATES.
(1) IT IS THE RESPONSIBILITY OF THE MEMBER STATES TO REPORT
ANY ADVERSE ACTION AGAINST A LICENSEE AND TO MONITOR THE DATABASE TO
DETERMINE WHETHER ADVERSE ACTION HAS BEEN TAKEN AGAINST A LICENSEE.
ADVERSE ACTION INFORMATION PERTAINING TO A LICENSEE IN ANY MEMBER
STATE WILL BE AVAILABLE TO ANY OTHER MEMBER STATE.
(F) MEMBER STATES CONTRIBUTING INFORMATION TO THE DATA SYSTEM
MAY DESIGNATE INFORMATION THAT MAY NOT BE SHARED WITH THE PUBLIC
WITHOUT THE EXPRESS PERMISSION OF THE CONTRIBUTING STATE.
(G) ANY INFORMATION SUBMITTED TO THE DATA SYSTEM THAT IS
SUBSEQUENTLY EXPUNGED PURSUANT TO FEDERAL LAW OR THE LAWS OF THE
MEMBER STATE CONTRIBUTING THE INFORMATION SHALL BE REMOVED FROM THE
DATA SYSTEM.
SECTION 12. RULEMAKING.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE REASONABLE RULES IN ORDER
TO EFFECTIVELY AND EFFICIENTLY IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THE PURPOSES
AND PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT. A RULE SHALL BE INVALID AND HAVE NO FORCE
OR EFFECT ONLY IF A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION HOLDS THAT THE RULE
IS INVALID BECAUSE THE COMMISSION EXERCISED ITS RULEMAKING AUTHORITY IN
A MANNER THAT IS BEYOND THE SCOPE AND PURPOSES OF THE COMPACT, OR THE
POWERS GRANTED HEREUNDER, OR BASED UPON ANOTHER APPLICABLE STANDARD
OF REVIEW.
(B) THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION SHALL HAVE THE FORCE OF LAW IN
EACH MEMBER STATE, PROVIDED HOWEVER THAT WHERE THE RULES OF THE
COMMISSION CONFLICT WITH THE LAWS OF THE MEMBER STATE THAT ESTABLISH
THE MEMBER STATE’S LAWS, REGULATIONS, AND APPLICABLE STANDARDS THAT
GOVERN THE PRACTICE OF SOCIAL WORK AS HELD BY A COURT OF COMPETENT
– 25 –

Ch. 10 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
JURISDICTION, THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION SHALL BE INEFFECTIVE IN THAT
STATE TO THE EXTENT OF THE CONFLICT.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL EXERCISE ITS RULEMAKING POWERS
PURSUANT TO THE CRITERIA SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION AND THE RULES ADOPTED
THEREUNDER. RULES SHALL BECOME BINDING AS ON THE DAY FOLLOWING
ADOPTION OR THE DATE SPECIFIED IN THE RULE OR AMENDMENT, WHICHEVER IS
LATER.
(D) IF A MAJORITY OF THE LEGISLATURES OF THE MEMBER STATES
REJECTS A RULE OR PORTION OF A RULE, BY ENACTMENT OF A STATUTE OR
RESOLUTION IN THE SAME MANNER USED TO ADOPT THE COMPACT WITHIN FOUR
YEARS OF THE DATE OF ADOPTION OF THE RULE, THEN SUCH RULE SHALL HAVE NO
FURTHER FORCE AND EFFECT IN ANY MEMBER STATE.
(E) RULES SHALL BE ADOPTED AT A REGULAR OR SPECIAL MEETING OF THE
COMMISSION.
(F) PRIOR TO ADOPTION OF A PROPOSED RULE, THE COMMISSION SHALL
HOLD A PUBLIC HEARING AND ALLOW PERSONS TO PROVIDE ORAL AND WRITTEN
COMMENTS, DATA, FACTS, OPINIONS, AND ARGUMENTS.
(G) PRIOR TO ADOPTION OF A PROPOSED RULE BY THE COMMISSION, AND
AT LEAST 30 DAYS IN ADVANCE OF THE MEETING AT WHICH THE COMMISSION WILL
HOLD A PUBLIC HEARING ON THE PROPOSED RULE, THE COMMISSION SHALL
PROVIDE A NOTICE OF PROPOSED RULEMAKING:
(1) ON THE WEBSITE OF THE COMMISSION OR OTHER PUBLICLY
ACCESSIBLE PLATFORM;
(2) TO PERSONS WHO HAVE REQUESTED NOTICE OF THE
COMMISSION’S NOTICES OF PROPOSED RULEMAKING; AND
(3) IN SUCH OTHER WAY(S) AS THE COMMISSION MAY BY RULE
SPECIFY.
(H) THE NOTICE OF PROPOSED RULEMAKING SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE TIME, DATE, AND LOCATION OF THE PUBLIC HEARING AT
WHICH THE COMMISSION WILL HEAR PUBLIC COMMENTS ON THE PROPOSED RULE,
AND, IF DIFFERENT, THE TIME, DATE, AND LOCATION OF THE MEETING WHERE THE
COMMISSION WILL CONSIDER AND VOTE ON THE PROPOSED RULE;
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
(2) IF THE HEARING IS HELD VIA TELECOMMUNICATION, VIDEO
CONFERENCE, OR OTHER ELECTRONIC MEANS, THE COMMISSION SHALL INCLUDE
THE MECHANISM FOR ACCESS TO THE HEARING IN THE NOTICE OF PROPOSED
RULEMAKING;
(3) THE TEXT OF THE PROPOSED RULE AND THE REASON THEREFOR;
(4) A REQUEST FOR COMMENTS ON THE PROPOSED RULE FROM ANY
INTERESTED PERSON; AND
(5) THE MANNER IN WHICH INTERESTED PERSONS MAY SUBMIT
WRITTEN COMMENTS.
(I) ALL HEARINGS WILL BE RECORDED. A COPY OF THE RECORDING AND
ALL WRITTEN COMMENTS AND DOCUMENTS RECEIVED BY THE COMMISSION IN
RESPONSE TO THE PROPOSED RULE SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC.
(J) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED AS REQUIRING A
SEPARATE HEARING ON EACH RULE. RULES MAY BE GROUPED FOR THE
CONVENIENCE OF THE COMMISSION AT HEARINGS REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION.
(K) THE COMMISSION SHALL, BY MAJORITY VOTE OF ALL MEMBERS, TAKE
FINAL ACTION ON THE PROPOSED RULE BASED ON THE RULEMAKING RECORD AND
THE FULL TEXT OF THE RULE.
(1) THE COMMISSION MAY ADOPT CHANGES TO THE PROPOSED RULE
PROVIDED THE CHANGES DO NOT ENLARGE THE ORIGINAL PURPOSE OF THE
PROPOSED RULE.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE AN EXPLANATION OF THE
REASONS FOR SUBSTANTIVE CHANGES MADE TO THE PROPOSED RULE AS WELL AS
REASONS FOR SUBSTANTIVE CHANGES NOT MADE THAT WERE RECOMMENDED BY
COMMENTERS.
(3) THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE A REASONABLE EFFECTIVE
DATE FOR THE RULE. EXCEPT FOR AN EMERGENCY AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 12(L),
THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE RULE SHALL BE NO SOONER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER
ISSUING THE NOTICE THAT IT ADOPTED OR AMENDED THE RULE.
(L) UPON DETERMINATION THAT AN EMERGENCY EXISTS, THE
COMMISSION MAY CONSIDER AND ADOPT AN EMERGENCY RULE WITH 48 HOURS’
NOTICE, WITH OPPORTUNITY TO COMMENT, PROVIDED THAT THE USUAL
RULEMAKING PROCEDURES PROVIDED IN THE COMPACT AND IN THIS SECTION
SHALL BE RETROACTIVELY APPLIED TO THE RULE AS SOON AS REASONABLY
– 27 –

Ch. 10 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
POSSIBLE, IN NO EVENT LATER THAN 90 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE
RULE. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS PROVISION, AN EMERGENCY RULE IS ONE THAT
MUST BE ADOPTED IMMEDIATELY IN ORDER TO:
(1) MEET AN IMMINENT THREAT TO PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, OR
WELFARE;
(2) PREVENT A LOSS OF COMMISSION OR MEMBER STATE FUNDS;
(3) MEET A DEADLINE FOR THE PROMULGATION OF A RULE THAT IS
ESTABLISHED BY FEDERAL LAW OR RULE; OR
(4) PROTECT PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY.
(M) THE COMMISSION OR AN AUTHORIZED COMMITTEE OF THE
COMMISSION MAY DIRECT REVISIONS TO A PREVIOUSLY ADOPTED RULE FOR
PURPOSES OF CORRECTING TYPOGRAPHICAL ERRORS, ERRORS IN FORMAT,
ERRORS IN CONSISTENCY, OR GRAMMATICAL ERRORS. PUBLIC NOTICE OF ANY
REVISIONS SHALL BE POSTED ON THE WEBSITE OF THE COMMISSION. THE REVISION
SHALL BE SUBJECT TO CHALLENGE BY ANY PERSON FOR A PERIOD OF 30 DAYS
AFTER POSTING. THE REVISION MAY BE CHALLENGED ONLY ON GROUNDS THAT THE
REVISION RESULTS IN A MATERIAL CHANGE TO A RULE. A CHALLENGE SHALL BE
MADE IN WRITING AND DELIVERED TO THE COMMISSION PRIOR TO THE END OF THE
NOTICE PERIOD. IF NO CHALLENGE IS MADE, THE REVISION WILL TAKE EFFECT
WITHOUT FURTHER ACTION. IF THE REVISION IS CHALLENGED, THE REVISION MAY
NOT TAKE EFFECT WITHOUT THE APPROVAL OF THE COMMISSION.
(N) NO MEMBER STATE’S RULEMAKING REQUIREMENTS SHALL APPLY
UNDER THIS COMPACT.
SECTION 13. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND
ENFORCEMENT.
(A) (1) THE EXECUTIVE AND JUDICIAL BRANCHES OF STATE
GOVERNMENT IN EACH MEMBER STATE SHALL ENFORCE THIS COMPACT AND TAKE
ALL ACTIONS NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE TO IMPLEMENT THE COMPACT.
(2) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS COMPACT, VENUE IS
PROPER AND JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS BY OR AGAINST THE COMMISSION SHALL BE
BROUGHT SOLELY AND EXCLUSIVELY IN A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION
WHERE THE PRINCIPAL OFFICE OF THE COMMISSION IS LOCATED. THE
COMMISSION MAY WAIVE VENUE AND JURISDICTIONAL DEFENSES TO THE EXTENT
IT ADOPTS OR CONSENTS TO PARTICIPATE IN ALTERNATIVE DISPUTE RESOLUTION
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
PROCEEDINGS. NOTHING HEREIN SHALL AFFECT OR LIMIT THE SELECTION OR
PROPRIETY OF VENUE IN ANY ACTION AGAINST A LICENSEE FOR PROFESSIONAL
MALPRACTICE, MISCONDUCT OR ANY SUCH SIMILAR MATTER.
(3) THE COMMISSION SHALL BE ENTITLED TO RECEIVE SERVICE OF
PROCESS IN ANY SUCH PROCEEDING REGARDING THE ENFORCEMENT OR
INTERPRETATION OF THE COMPACT, AND SHALL HAVE STANDING TO INTERVENE IN
SUCH A PROCEEDING FOR ALL PURPOSES. FAILURE TO PROVIDE THE COMMISSION
SERVICE OF PROCESS RENDERS A JUDGMENT OR ORDER VOID AS TO THE
COMMISSION, THE COMPACT, OR PROMULGATED RULES.
(B) (1) IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT A MEMBER STATE HAS
DEFAULTED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF ITS OBLIGATIONS OR RESPONSIBILITIES
UNDER THIS COMPACT OR THE PROMULGATED RULES, THE COMMISSION SHALL
PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE DEFAULTING STATE. THE NOTICE OF DEFAULT
SHALL DESCRIBE THE DEFAULT, THE PROPOSED MEANS OF CURING THE DEFAULT,
AND ANY OTHER ACTION THAT THE COMMISSION MAY TAKE, AND SHALL OFFER
TRAINING AND SPECIFIC TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE REGARDING THE DEFAULT.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE A COPY OF THE NOTICE OF
DEFAULT TO THE OTHER MEMBER STATES.
(C) IF A STATE IN DEFAULT FAILS TO CURE THE DEFAULT, THE DEFAULTING
STATE MAY BE TERMINATED FROM THE COMPACT UPON AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF
A MAJORITY OF THE DELEGATES OF THE MEMBER STATES, AND ALL RIGHTS,
PRIVILEGES AND BENEFITS CONFERRED ON THAT STATE BY THIS COMPACT MAY BE
TERMINATED ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION. A CURE OF THE DEFAULT
DOES NOT RELIEVE THE OFFENDING STATE OF OBLIGATIONS OR LIABILITIES
INCURRED DURING THE PERIOD OF DEFAULT.
(D) TERMINATION OF MEMBERSHIP IN THE COMPACT SHALL BE IMPOSED
ONLY AFTER ALL OTHER MEANS OF SECURING COMPLIANCE HAVE BEEN
EXHAUSTED. NOTICE OF INTENT TO SUSPEND OR TERMINATE SHALL BE GIVEN BY
THE COMMISSION TO THE GOVERNOR, THE MAJORITY AND MINORITY LEADERS OF
THE DEFAULTING STATE’S LEGISLATURE, THE DEFAULTING STATE’S STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY, AND EACH OF THE MEMBER STATES’ LICENSING
AUTHORITY.
(E) A STATE THAT HAS BEEN TERMINATED IS RESPONSIBLE FOR ALL
ASSESSMENTS, OBLIGATIONS, AND LIABILITIES INCURRED THROUGH THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION, INCLUDING OBLIGATIONS THAT EXTEND
BEYOND THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION.
– 29 –

Ch. 10 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(F) UPON THE TERMINATION OF A STATE’S MEMBERSHIP FROM THIS
COMPACT, THAT STATE SHALL IMMEDIATELY PROVIDE NOTICE TO ALL LICENSEES
WITHIN THAT STATE OF SUCH TERMINATION. THE TERMINATED STATE SHALL
CONTINUE TO RECOGNIZE ALL LICENSES GRANTED PURSUANT TO THIS COMPACT
FOR A MINIMUM OF SIX MONTHS AFTER THE DATE OF SAID NOTICE OF TERMINATION.
(G) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT BEAR ANY COSTS RELATED TO A STATE
THAT IS FOUND TO BE IN DEFAULT OR THAT HAS BEEN TERMINATED FROM THE
COMPACT, UNLESS AGREED UPON IN WRITING BETWEEN THE COMMISSION AND THE
DEFAULTING STATE.
(H) THE DEFAULTING STATE MAY APPEAL THE ACTION OF THE COMMISSION
BY PETITIONING THE U.S. DISTRICT COURT FOR THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA OR
THE FEDERAL DISTRICT WHERE THE COMMISSION HAS ITS PRINCIPAL OFFICES.
THE PREVAILING PARTY SHALL BE AWARDED ALL COSTS OF SUCH LITIGATION,
INCLUDING REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(I) (1) UPON REQUEST BY A MEMBER STATE, THE COMMISSION SHALL
ATTEMPT TO RESOLVE DISPUTES RELATED TO THE COMPACT THAT ARISE AMONG
MEMBER STATES AND BETWEEN MEMBER AND NON–MEMBER STATES.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE A RULE PROVIDING FOR
BOTH MEDIATION AND BINDING DISPUTE RESOLUTION FOR DISPUTES AS
APPROPRIATE.
(J) (1) BY MAJORITY VOTE AS PROVIDED BY RULE, THE COMMISSION
MAY INITIATE LEGAL ACTION AGAINST A MEMBER STATE IN DEFAULT IN THE
UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT FOR THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA OR THE
FEDERAL DISTRICT WHERE THE COMMISSION HAS ITS PRINCIPAL OFFICES TO
ENFORCE COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT AND ITS
PROMULGATED RULES. THE RELIEF SOUGHT MAY INCLUDE BOTH INJUNCTIVE
RELIEF AND DAMAGES. IN THE EVENT JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT IS NECESSARY, THE
PREVAILING MEMBER SHALL BE AWARDED ALL COSTS OF SUCH LITIGATION,
INCLUDING REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES. THE REMEDIES HEREIN SHALL NOT BE
THE EXCLUSIVE REMEDIES OF THE COMMISSION. THE COMMISSION MAY PURSUE
ANY OTHER REMEDIES AVAILABLE UNDER FEDERAL OR THE DEFAULTING MEMBER
STATE’S LAW.
(2) A MEMBER STATE MAY INITIATE LEGAL ACTION AGAINST THE
COMMISSION IN THE U.S. DISTRICT COURT FOR THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA OR
THE FEDERAL DISTRICT WHERE THE COMMISSION HAS ITS PRINCIPAL OFFICES TO
ENFORCE COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT AND ITS
PROMULGATED RULES. THE RELIEF SOUGHT MAY INCLUDE BOTH INJUNCTIVE
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
RELIEF AND DAMAGES. IN THE EVENT JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT IS NECESSARY, THE
PREVAILING PARTY SHALL BE AWARDED ALL COSTS OF SUCH LITIGATION,
INCLUDING REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(3) NO PERSON OTHER THAN A MEMBER STATE SHALL ENFORCE THIS
COMPACT AGAINST THE COMMISSION.
SECTION 14. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT.
(A) THE COMPACT SHALL COME INTO EFFECT ON THE DATE ON WHICH THE
COMPACT STATUTE IS ENACTED INTO LAW IN THE SEVENTH MEMBER STATE.
(1) ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE COMPACT, THE
COMMISSION SHALL CONVENE AND REVIEW THE ENACTMENT OF EACH OF THE
FIRST SEVEN MEMBER STATES (“CHARTER MEMBER STATES”) TO DETERMINE IF
THE STATUTE ENACTED BY EACH SUCH CHARTER MEMBER STATE IS MATERIALLY
DIFFERENT THAN THE MODEL COMPACT STATUTE.
(I) A CHARTER MEMBER STATE WHOSE ENACTMENT IS FOUND
TO BE MATERIALLY DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL COMPACT STATUTE SHALL BE
ENTITLED TO THE DEFAULT PROCESS SET FORTH IN SECTION 13.
(II) IF ANY MEMBER STATE IS LATER FOUND TO BE IN DEFAULT,
OR IS TERMINATED OR WITHDRAWS FROM THE COMPACT, THE COMMISSION SHALL
REMAIN IN EXISTENCE AND THE COMPACT SHALL REMAIN IN EFFECT EVEN IF THE
NUMBER OF MEMBER STATES SHOULD BE LESS THAN SEVEN.
(2) MEMBER STATES ENACTING THE COMPACT SUBSEQUENT TO THE
SEVEN INITIAL CHARTER MEMBER STATES SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE PROCESS SET
FORTH IN SECTION 10(C)(21) TO DETERMINE IF THEIR ENACTMENTS ARE
MATERIALLY DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL COMPACT STATUTE AND WHETHER
THEY QUALIFY FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT.
(3) ALL ACTIONS TAKEN FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE COMMISSION OR
IN FURTHERANCE OF THE PURPOSES OF THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE COMPACT
PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE COMPACT OR THE COMMISSION COMING
INTO EXISTENCE SHALL BE CONSIDERED TO BE ACTIONS OF THE COMMISSION
UNLESS SPECIFICALLY REPUDIATED BY THE COMMISSION.
(4) ANY STATE THAT JOINS THE COMPACT SUBSEQUENT TO THE
COMMISSION’S INITIAL ADOPTION OF THE RULES AND BYLAWS SHALL BE SUBJECT
TO THE RULES AND BYLAWS AS THEY EXIST ON THE DATE ON WHICH THE COMPACT
BECOMES LAW IN THAT STATE. ANY RULE THAT HAS BEEN PREVIOUSLY ADOPTED BY
– 31 –

Ch. 10 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
THE COMMISSION SHALL HAVE THE FULL FORCE AND EFFECT OF LAW ON THE DAY
THE COMPACT BECOMES LAW IN THAT STATE.
(B) ANY MEMBER STATE MAY WITHDRAW FROM THE COMPACT BY
ENACTING A STATUTE REPEALING THE SAME.
(1) A MEMBER STATE’S WITHDRAWAL SHALL NOT TAKE EFFECT
UNTIL 180 DAYS AFTER ENACTMENT OF THE REPEALING STATUTE.
(2) WITHDRAWAL SHALL NOT AFFECT THE CONTINUING
REQUIREMENT OF THE WITHDRAWING STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY TO COMPLY
WITH THE INVESTIGATIVE AND ADVERSE ACTION REPORTING REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS ACT PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF WITHDRAWAL.
(3) UPON THE ENACTMENT OF A STATUTE WITHDRAWING FROM THIS
COMPACT, A STATE SHALL IMMEDIATELY PROVIDE NOTICE OF SUCH WITHDRAWAL
TO ALL LICENSEES WITHIN THAT STATE. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY SUBSEQUENT
STATUTORY ENACTMENT TO THE CONTRARY, SUCH WITHDRAWING STATE SHALL
CONTINUE TO RECOGNIZE ALL LICENSES GRANTED PURSUANT TO THIS COMPACT
FOR A MINIMUM OF 180 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF SUCH NOTICE OF WITHDRAWAL.
(C) NOTHING CONTAINED IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO
INVALIDATE OR PREVENT ANY SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE AGREEMENT OR OTHER
COOPERATIVE ARRANGEMENT BETWEEN A MEMBER STATE AND A NON–MEMBER
STATE THAT DOES NOT CONFLICT WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS COMPACT.
(D) THIS COMPACT MAY BE AMENDED BY THE MEMBER STATES. NO
AMENDMENT TO THE COMPACT SHALL BECOME EFFECTIVE AND BINDING UPON ANY
MEMBER STATE UNTIL IT IS ENACTED INTO THE LAWS OF ALL MEMBER STATES.
SECTION 15. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY.
(A) THIS COMPACT AND THE COMMISSION’S RULEMAKING AUTHORITY
SHALL BE LIBERALLY CONSTRUED SO AS TO EFFECTUATE THE PURPOSES, AND THE
IMPLEMENTATION AND ADMINISTRATION OF THE COMPACT. PROVISIONS OF THE
COMPACT EXPRESSLY AUTHORIZING OR REQUIRING THE PROMULGATION OF RULES
SHALL NOT BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT THE COMMISSION’S RULEMAKING AUTHORITY
SOLELY FOR THOSE PURPOSES.
(B) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS COMPACT SHALL BE SEVERABLE AND IF ANY
PHRASE, CLAUSE, SENTENCE OR PROVISION OF THIS COMPACT IS HELD BY A COURT
OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION TO BE CONTRARY TO THE CONSTITUTION OF ANY
MEMBER STATE, A STATE SEEKING PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT, OR OF THE
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
UNITED STATES, OR THE APPLICABILITY THEREOF TO ANY GOVERNMENT, AGENCY,
PERSON OR CIRCUMSTANCE IS HELD TO BE UNCONSTITUTIONAL BY A COURT OF
COMPETENT JURISDICTION, THE VALIDITY OF THE REMAINDER OF THE COMPACT
AND THE APPLICABILITY THEREOF TO ANY GOVERNMENT, AGENCY, PERSON, OR
CIRCUMSTANCE SHALL NOT BE AFFECTED THEREBY.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION MAY DENY A STATE’S PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT OR, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 13(B), TERMINATE A MEMBER
STATE’S PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT, IF IT DETERMINES THAT A
CONSTITUTIONAL REQUIREMENT OF A MEMBER STATE IS A MATERIAL DEPARTURE
FROM THE COMPACT. OTHERWISE, IF THIS COMPACT SHALL BE HELD TO BE
CONTRARY TO THE CONSTITUTION OF ANY MEMBER STATE, THE COMPACT SHALL
REMAIN IN FULL FORCE AND EFFECT AS TO THE REMAINING MEMBER STATES AND
IN FULL FORCE AND EFFECT AS TO THE MEMBER STATE AFFECTED AS TO ALL
SEVERABLE MATTERS.
SECTION 16. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS.
(A) A LICENSEE PROVIDING SERVICES IN A REMOTE STATE UNDER A
MULTISTATE AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE SHALL ADHERE TO THE LAWS AND
REGULATIONS, INCLUDING LAWS, REGULATIONS, AND APPLICABLE STANDARDS, OF
THE REMOTE STATE WHERE THE CLIENT IS LOCATED AT THE TIME CARE IS
RENDERED.
(B) NOTHING HEREIN SHALL PREVENT OR INHIBIT THE ENFORCEMENT OF
ANY OTHER LAW OF A MEMBER STATE THAT IS NOT INCONSISTENT WITH THE
COMPACT.
(C) ANY LAWS, STATUTES, REGULATIONS, OR OTHER LEGAL
REQUIREMENTS IN A MEMBER STATE IN CONFLICT WITH THE COMPACT ARE
SUPERSEDED TO THE EXTENT OF THE CONFLICT.
(D) ALL PERMISSIBLE AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE COMMISSION AND THE
MEMBER STATES ARE BINDING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THEIR TERMS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is contingent on the
enacting of substantially similar legislation in six other states. The Maryland Department
of Health shall notify the Department of Legislative Services within 10 days after six states
have enacted legislation that is substantially similar to this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 2 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2025.
– 33 –

Ch. 10 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 34 –